New York, session 2025-2026, S920.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2261 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 7 to read as follows: 3 7. Rules of the road pamphlet requirement. Every person operating a 4 limited use motorcycle registered in accordance with any of the 5 provisions of this article, shall be provided with information related 6 to the legal use of such limited use motorcycle upon such registration. 7 Such information shall be published in the ten most commonly spoken 8 languages in New York state and shall include, but not be limited to, 9 the rules of the road, speed limits, where such operator can ride such 10 limited use motorcycle, and consequences of non-compliance for each such 11 rule. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 13 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 14 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 15 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 16 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01010-01-5